Massachusetts, session 194th, H3874.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subsection (a) of section 78 of chapter 10 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the
following words:-
As used in this section, the term “Korean Emergency” shall mean the period on or after
June 25, 1950 to January 31, 1955.
As used in this section, the term “Persian Gulf War” shall mean the period on or after
August 2, 1990 to April 10, 1991.
As used in this section, the term “Vietnam Conflict” shall mean the period on or after
July 1, 1958 to May 17, 1975.
As used in this section, the term “World War II” shall mean the period on or after
September 16, 1940 to July 25, 1947.
of 4

SECTION 2. Subparagraph (1) of subsection (b) of said section 78 of said chapter 10 of
the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word
“served”, in line 16, the following words:- “, or is currently serving,”
SECTION 3. Subparagraph (1) of subsection (b) of said section 78 of said chapter 10 of
the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by striking out, in lines 19 through
23, the words “have been in the commonwealth for a period of not less than 6 months before the
time of the person's entry into the service” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
“be the commonwealth”
SECTION 4. Subparagraph (5) of said subsection (b) of said section 78 of said chapter 10
of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking
out, in line 44, the word “Medal” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
“Medal, or equivalent Expeditionary Medal,”
SECTION 5. Said subparagraph (5) of said subsection (b) of said section 78 of said
chapter 10 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by striking out, in
lines 48 through 52, the words “have been in the commonwealth for a period of not less than 6
months immediately before the time of the person's entry into service” and inserting in place
thereof the following words:- be the commonwealth
SECTION 6. Said subsection (b) of said section 78 of said chapter 10 of the General
Laws, as so appearing is hereby further amended by inserting at the end thereof the following
subparagraph:-
of 4

(6) Upon application, as provided in this section and as specified in rules and regulations
established by the treasurer, there shall be allowed and paid out of the treasury of the
commonwealth, without appropriation, the sums specified in such rules and regulations to each
person who has served in the armed forces of the United States in active service as part of World
War II, the Korean Emergency, the Vietnam War or the Persian Gulf War; provided, however,
that the domicile of a person on account of whose service the application is filed shall be the
commonwealth; and provided further, that any veteran discharged or released under other than
honorable conditions due to sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression or HIV status
based on the veteran's DD-214 form or equivalent documentation shall be eligible for a bonus
under this section.
SECTION 7. Subsection (e) of said section 78 of said chapter 10 of the General Laws, as
so appearing, is hereby further amended by striking out the fifth and sixth sentences.
SECTION 8. Subsection (e) of said section 78 of said chapter 10 of the General Laws, as
so appearing, is hereby further amended by striking out, in line 100, the word “section” and
inserting in place thereof the following word:- act
SECTION 9. Subsection (e) of said section 78 of said chapter 10 of the General Laws, as
so appearing, is hereby further amended by striking out, in lines 106-107, the word “designed”
and inserting in place thereof the following word:- designated
SECTION 10. Subsection (g) of said section 78 of said chapter 10 of the General Laws,
as so appearing, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “service”, in line X, the
following words:- “during the enlistment period”
of 4

SECTION 11. Chapter 731 of the acts of 1945, as amended by chapter 210 of the acts of
1946, is hereby repealed.
SECTION 12. Chapter 210 of the acts of 1946 is hereby repealed.
SECTION 13. Chapter 581 of the acts of 1946, as amended by chapter 210 of the acts of
1946, is hereby repealed.
SECTION 14. Chapter 440 of the Acts of 1953 is hereby repealed.
SECTION 15. Chapter 646 of the acts of 1968 is hereby repealed.
SECTION 16. Chapter 325 of the acts of 1969 is hereby repealed.
SECTION 17. Section 16 of chapter 130 of the acts of 2005 is hereby repealed.
SECTION 18. Section 2 shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
of 4